Washington statutes.
RCW 19.160.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Local telephone directory" means a publication listing telephone numbers for various businesses in a certain geographic area and distributed free of charge to some or all telephone subscribers in that area.

(2) "Local telephone number" means a specific telephone number, area code and prefix, assigned for the purpose of completing local calls between a calling party or station and any other party or station within a designated exchange or all of its designated local calling areas. The term "local telephone number" does not include long distance telephone numbers or any toll-free telephone numbers listed in a local telephone directory.

(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation.

[ 2015 c 168 s 1; 1999 c 156 s 1.]